New York, session 2025-2026, A2388.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The first undesignated paragraph of section 1662-a of the 2 vehicle and traffic law is designated subdivision 1 and a new subdivi- 3 sion 2 is added to read as follows: 4 2. Each city, town, or village in the state of New York may by local 5 law establish maximum speed limits at which vehicles may proceed on or 6 along such city, town, or village highways in such city, town, or 7 village other than state or county highways maintained by the state or 8 county department of transportation, lower than fifty-five miles per 9 hour statutory maximum speed limit. No such speed limit applicable on or 10 along such designated highways within such city, town, or village shall 11 be established at less than twenty-five miles per hour, except that 12 school speed limits may be established at not less than fifteen miles 13 per hour, for a distance not to exceed one thousand three hundred twenty 14 feet, on a highway passing a school building, entrance or exit of a 15 school abutting on the highway. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01102-01-5